Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB113.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Correctional and Forensic Employees Investigation Procedure Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish guidelines and procedures governing the investigation and interrogation of correctional and forensic employees during certain investigations by the Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Correctional employee." An individual employed under the Governor's jurisdiction with whom the duty of care, custody and control of an offender is required."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth or the Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Employee." A correctional or forensic employee under this act."Forensic employee." An individual employed under the Governor's jurisdiction with whom the duty of care, custody and control of a patient is required."Interrogation." The formal and systematic questioning of an employee accused in a complaint of misconduct which may result in dismissal, demotion, suspension, reduction in salary, written reprimand or transfer for punitive purposes. The term does not include the normal questioning of an employee which occurs in the normal course of duty, counseling, instruction, informal verbal admonishment or other routine or unplanned contact with a supervisor."Misconduct." Any of the following:(1) The performance of an act which is unlawful.(2) The improper performance of a lawful act, including an act which constitutes a violation of department policy for which there is no analogous criminal offense.(3) The omission of an act which a person has a legal duty to perform.Section 4. Rights of employees.If an employee is under investigation and subject to interrogation by the department, the following standards shall 20250SB0113PN0064 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apply:(1) The interrogation shall take place at one of the following locations:(i) The office of the investigating officer.(ii) The office of a correctional facility or forensic facility conducting the investigation.(iii) An office within a building owned or leased by the department.(iv) Other locations as is necessary to protect the safety or identity of the employee or is otherwise consented to by the employee.(2) At the beginning of the interrogation, the employee under interrogation shall be informed of the name and professional title of the individual in charge of the interrogation and the names and professional titles of each individual that will be present.(3) The employee under interrogation shall be informed whether the investigation is administrative, and therefore compelled as a condition of employment, or criminal. If an investigation is administrative, the employee shall be read a statement that the employee's answers are protected as a matter of law and advised that the employee has a right to representation. If an investigation is criminal, the employee shall be read warnings as provided by law and advised any statements made are not compelled as a condition of the employee's employment.(4) The interrogation shall allow for personal necessities and for rest periods as are reasonably necessary.(5) The employee under interrogation may not be offered promises of reward or threatened in connection with the 20250SB0113PN0064 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation.(6) The complete interrogation shall be recorded with audio, including recess periods. A copy of the record shall be made available to the employee or the employee's counsel or representative, upon request, without cost.(7) The employee under interrogation shall have the right to be represented by counsel or other representative as provided by existing Federal and State law.(8) An employee may not be compelled to submit to a polygraph examination. No disciplinary action or other recrimination may be taken against an employee for refusing to submit to a polygraph examination. No testimony or evidence shall be admissible at a subsequent hearing, trial or proceeding, judicial or administrative, to the effect that the employee refused to take a polygraph examination.(9) An employee may not be subjected to or threatened with adverse employment action as a result of the exercise of the rights afforded to employees under this act.(10) An employee may not be required to disclose greater information as to property, income, assets, source of income, debts or personal or domestic expenditures, including those of any member of the employee's family or household, than the principal elected officials of the department are required to disclose, unless the nature of the investigation necessitates the disclosure of the information and the information is obtained under proper legal procedures.Section 5. Impact of collective bargaining agreements.(a) Additional rights.--(1) If there is a conflict between an existing collective bargaining agreement and the rights and coverage 20250SB0113PN0064 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this act, the collective bargaining agreement shall govern.(2) The rights and coverage under this act may not be diminished by a collective bargaining agreement entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(b) Department obligation.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish the obligation of the department to comply with a collective bargaining agreement which provides greater rights and coverage to correctional officers than the rights and coverage provided by this act.Section 6. Suspensions pending investigation.(a) Procedure.--A suspension pending investigation of an employee shall be in accordance with the provisions of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform), regardless of the employee's civil service status, except as follows:(1) A suspension pending investigation may not be utilized unless the department has just cause for the employee's removal from the workplace in lieu of a temporary administrative transfer.(2) All suspensions pending investigation shall be with pay and contractual benefits except as noted in subsection (b).(3) Medical benefits and insurance shall continue during the period of suspension.(b) Governor's code of conduct.--(1) An employee against whom a criminal proceeding has been instituted and the requirements of 4 Pa. Code Ch. 7 Subch. K (relating to code of conduct for appointed officials and State employees) have been triggered may be suspended pending investigation without pay. Medical benefits and 20250SB0113PN0064 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance to which an employee and spouse and dependents are entitled by virtue of employment may not be suspended until conviction or separation of the employee from the department, whichever occurs first.(2) If the employee's criminal charges are resolved and the provisions of 4 Pa. Code Ch. 7 Subch. K no longer apply, the employee shall be reinstated and reimbursed for all salary and benefits that have not been paid during the suspension period.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0113PN0064 - 6 - 1234567891011